New York, session 2025-2026, S8551.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-z 2 to read as follows: 3 § 837-z. Blue light emergency phones program. 1. Within amounts appro- 4 priated therefor, the division shall implement a blue light emergency 5 phones grant program for the purpose of public safety. Under such 6 program, the division shall provide grants to municipalities to install 7 blue lighted emergency phones that, when used, shall automatically dial 8 9-1-1 and ring directly to the police department. Municipalities shall 9 install such blue light emergency phones in public parks and other 10 public areas with a history of illicit drug activity or overdoses. 11 2. The commissioner shall cause a study to be performed to analyze how 12 the implementation of the blue light emergency phones grant program 13 impacts public safety. 14 3. Eighteen months after the effective date of this section, the 15 commissioner shall complete the study conducted pursuant to subdivision 16 two of this section and shall thereafter deliver a copy of the findings 17 of the study and any legislative recommendations deemed to be necessary 18 to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, and the speaker 19 of the assembly. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 21 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13603-01-5